Washington statutes.
RCW 18.180.020

Registration renewal.

A process server required to register under RCW 18.180.010 must renew the registration within one year of the date of the initial registration or when the registrant changes his or her name, the name of his or her business, business address, or business telephone number, whichever occurs sooner. If the renewal is required because of a change in the information identifying the process server, the process server must renew the registration within ten days of the date the identifying information changes. The process server shall pay the registration fee upon renewal.

[ 1992 c 125 s 3.]